Utah statutes.
62A-15-1001.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Attending physician" means a physician licensed to practice medicine in this state who has primary responsibility for the care and treatment of the declarant.

(2)  "Attorney-in-fact" means an adult properly appointed under this part to make mental health treatment decisions for a declarant under a declaration for mental health treatment.

(3)  "Incapable" means that, in the opinion of the court in a guardianship proceeding under Title 75, Utah Uniform Probate Code, or in the opinion of two physicians, a person's ability to receive and evaluate information effectively or communicate decisions is impaired to such an extent that the person currently lacks the capacity to make mental health treatment decisions.

(4)  "Mental health facility" means the same as that term is defined in Section 62A-15-602.

(5)  "Mental health treatment" means convulsive treatment, treatment with psychoactive medication, or admission to and retention in a facility for a period not to exceed 17 days.

